src/articles/articles.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +DefArt +IndefArt +PartArt +Mas +Fem +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
le+DefArt+Mas+Sg:le		#;
le+DefArt+Fem+Sg:la		#;
le+DefArt+Mas+Pl:les	#;
le+DefArt+Fem+Pl:les	#;
le+DefArt+Mas+Sg:l'		#;
le+DefArt+Fem+Sg:l'		#;

un+IndefArt+Mas+Sg:un	#;
un+IndefArt+Fem+Sg:une	#;
un+IndefArt+Mas+Pl:des	#;
un+IndefArt+Fem+Pl:des	#;

du+PartArt+Mas+Sg:du	#;
du+PartArt+Mas+Pl:des	#;
du+PartArt+Fem+Pl:des	#;
